North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 5. Auditor. [Repealed]

§ 147-55.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, s. 1.

§ 147-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, s. 1.

§ 147-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 884, s. 12.

§ 147-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, s. 1.

§§ 147-59 through 147-61.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 302.

§ 147-62.

Recodified as § 143-3.3 by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, s. 49.

§§ 147-63,
147-64.
[Repealed]

Recodified as § 143-3.4 by Session Laws 1983, c. 913, ss. 50, 51.